Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201519-4020
Business improvement district; created; location.

A business improvement district may be created as provided by the Business Improvement District Act and shall be within the boundaries of a business area.

Laws 1979, LB 251, § 6;

Laws 1983, LB 22, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB168, § 5.
August 30, 2015